Illinois, session 104th, HB5145.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 5changing Sections 1, 6, and 7 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 140/1)  (from Ch. 116, par. 201)7    Sec. 1. Pursuant to the fundamental philosophy of the 8American constitutional form of government, it is declared to 9be the public policy of the State of Illinois that all persons 10are entitled to full and complete information regarding the 11affairs of government and the official acts and policies of 12those who represent them as public officials and public 13employees consistent with the terms of this Act. Such access 14is necessary to enable the people to fulfill their duties of 15discussing public issues fully and freely, making informed 16political judgments and monitoring government to ensure that 17it is being conducted in the public interest.18    The General Assembly hereby declares that it is the public 19policy of the State of Illinois that access by all persons to 20public records promotes the transparency and accountability of 21public bodies at all levels of government. It is a fundamental 22obligation of government to operate openly and provide public 23records as expediently and efficiently as possible in   HB5145- 2 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1compliance with this Act.2     This Act is not intended to cause an unwarranted invasion 3of personal privacy, nor to allow the requests of a commercial 4enterprise to unduly burden public resources, or to disrupt 5the duly-undertaken work of any public body independent of the 6fulfillment of any of the fore-mentioned rights of the people 7to access to information.8    This Act is not intended to create an obligation on the 9part of any public body to maintain or prepare any public 10record which was not maintained or prepared by such public 11body at the time when this Act becomes effective, except as 12otherwise required by applicable local, State or federal law.13    This Act is not intended to circumvent the process used by 14the courts to address whether arrest and booking records, mug 15shots, body-worn camera footage, in-car camera footage, 9-1-1 16audio files, crime scene photographs, or other similar law 17enforcement records are to be made publicly available, except 18as those records may be relevant to a current or potential case 19or claim by the requester. 20    Restraints on access to information, to the extent 21permitted by this Act, are limited exceptions to the principle 22that the people of this State have a right to full disclosure 23of information relating to the decisions, policies, 24procedures, rules, standards, and other aspects of government 25activity that affect the conduct of government and the lives 26of any or all of the people. The provisions of this Act shall   HB5145- 3 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1be construed in accordance with this principle. This Act shall 2be construed to require disclosure of requested information as 3expediently and efficiently as possible and adherence to the 4deadlines established in this Act. 5    The General Assembly recognizes that this Act imposes 6fiscal obligations on public bodies to provide adequate staff 7and equipment to comply with its requirements. The General 8Assembly declares that providing records in compliance with 9the requirements of this Act is a primary duty of public bodies 10to the people of this State, and this Act should be construed 11to this end, fiscal obligations notwithstanding. 12    The General Assembly further recognizes that technology 13may advance at a rate that outpaces its ability to address 14those advances legislatively. To the extent that this Act may 15not expressly apply to those technological advances, this Act 16should nonetheless be interpreted to further the declared 17policy of this Act that public records shall be made available 18upon request except when denial of access furthers the public 19policy underlying a specific exemption. 20    This Act shall be the exclusive State statute on freedom 21of information, except to the extent that other State statutes 22might create additional restrictions on disclosure of 23information or other laws in Illinois might create additional 24obligations for disclosure of information to the public.25(Source: P.A. 96-542, eff. 1-1-10.)   HB5145- 4 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1    (5 ILCS 140/6)  (from Ch. 116, par. 206)2    Sec. 6. Authority to charge fees. 3    (a) When a person requests a copy of a record maintained in 4an electronic format, the public body shall furnish it in the 5electronic format specified by the requester, if feasible. If 6it is not feasible to furnish the public records in the 7specified electronic format, then the public body shall 8furnish it in the format in which it is maintained by the 9public body, or in paper format at the option of the requester. 10A public body may charge the requester for the actual cost of 11purchasing the recording medium, whether disc, diskette, tape, 12or other medium. If a request is not a request for a commercial 13purpose or a voluminous request, a public body may not charge 14the requester for the costs of any search for and review of the 15records or other personnel costs associated with reproducing 16the records. Except to the extent that the General Assembly 17expressly provides, statutory fees applicable to copies of 18public records when furnished in a paper format shall not be 19applicable to those records when furnished in an electronic 20format. 21    (a-5) If a voluminous request is for electronic records 22and those records are not in a portable document format (PDF), 23the public body may charge up to $20 for not more than 2 24megabytes of data, up to $40 for more than 2 but not more than 254 megabytes of data, and up to $100 for more than 4 megabytes 26of data. If a voluminous request is for electronic records and   HB5145- 5 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1those records are in a portable document format, the public 2body may charge up to $20 for not more than 80 megabytes of 3data, up to $40 for more than 80 megabytes but not more than 4160 megabytes of data, and up to $100 for more than 160 5megabytes of data. If the responsive electronic records are in 6both a portable document format and not in a portable document 7format, the public body may separate the fees and charge the 8requester under both fee scales.9    If a public body imposes a fee pursuant to this subsection 10(a-5), it must provide the requester with an accounting of all 11fees, costs, and personnel hours in connection with the 12request for public records. 13    (b) Except when a fee is otherwise fixed by statute, each 14public body may charge fees reasonably calculated to reimburse 15its actual cost for reproducing and certifying public records 16and for the use, by any person, of the equipment of the public 17body to copy records. No fees shall be charged for the first 50 18pages of black and white, letter or legal sized copies 19requested by a requester. The fee for black and white, letter 20or legal sized copies shall not exceed 25 15 cents per page. If 21a public body provides copies in color or in a size other than 22letter or legal, the public body may not charge more than its 23actual cost for reproducing the records. In calculating its 24actual cost for reproducing records or for the use of the 25equipment of the public body to reproduce records, a public 26body shall not include the costs of any search for and review   HB5145- 6 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1of the records or other personnel costs associated with 2reproducing the records, except for commercial requests as 3provided in subsection (f) of this Section. Such fees shall be 4imposed according to a standard scale of fees, established and 5made public by the body imposing them. The cost for certifying 6a record shall not exceed $1. 7    (c) Documents shall be furnished without charge or at a 8reduced charge, as determined by the public body, if the 9person requesting the documents states the specific purpose 10for the request and indicates that a waiver or reduction of the 11fee is in the public interest. Waiver or reduction of the fee 12is in the public interest if the principal purpose of the 13request is to access and disseminate information regarding the 14health, safety and welfare or the legal rights of the general 15public and is not for the principal purpose of personal or 16commercial benefit. For purposes of this subsection, 17"commercial benefit" shall not apply to requests made by news 18media when the principal purpose of the request is to access 19and disseminate information regarding the health, safety, and 20welfare or the legal rights of the general public. In setting 21the amount of the waiver or reduction, the public body may take 22into consideration the amount of materials requested and the 23cost of copying them.24    (d) The imposition of a fee not consistent with 25subsections (6)(a) and (b) of this Act constitutes a denial of 26access to public records for the purposes of judicial review.  HB5145- 7 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1    (e) The fee for each abstract of a driver's record shall be 2as provided in Section 6-118 of "The Illinois Vehicle Code", 3approved September 29, 1969, as amended, whether furnished as 4a paper copy or as an electronic copy.5    (f) A public body may charge up to one-quarter of the 6current hourly wage paid by the public body $10 for each 7quarter hour spent by personnel in searching for and 8retrieving a requested record or examining the record for 9necessary redactions. No fees shall be charged for the first 10hour 8 hours spent by personnel in searching for or retrieving 11a requested record. A public body may charge the actual cost of 12retrieving and transporting public records from an off-site 13storage facility when the public records are maintained by a 14third-party storage company under contract with the public 15body. If a public body imposes a fee pursuant to this 16subsection (f), it must provide the requester with an 17accounting of all fees, costs, and personnel hours in 18connection with the request for public records. The provisions 19of this subsection (f) apply only to commercial requests. 20(Source: P.A. 97-579, eff. 8-26-11; 98-1129, eff. 12-3-14.) 21    (5 ILCS 140/7)22    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-300)23    Sec. 7. Exemptions. 24    (1) When a request is made to inspect or copy a public 25record that contains information that is exempt from   HB5145- 8 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1disclosure under this Section, but also contains information 2that is not exempt from disclosure, the public body may elect 3to redact the information that is exempt. The public body 4shall make the remaining information available for inspection 5and copying. Subject to this requirement, the following shall 6be exempt from inspection and copying: 7        (a) Information specifically prohibited from 8    disclosure by federal or State law or rules and 9    regulations implementing federal or State law. 10        (b) Private information, unless disclosure is required 11    by another provision of this Act, a State or federal law, 12    or a court order. 13        (b-5) Files, documents, and other data or databases 14    maintained by one or more law enforcement agencies and 15    specifically designed to provide information to one or 16    more law enforcement agencies regarding the physical or 17    mental status of one or more individual subjects. 18        (c) Personal information contained within public 19    records, the disclosure of which would constitute a 20    clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy, unless 21    the disclosure is consented to in writing by the 22    individual subjects of the information. "Unwarranted 23    invasion of personal privacy" means the disclosure of 24    information that is highly personal or objectionable to a 25    reasonable person and in which the subject's right to 26    privacy outweighs any legitimate public interest in   HB5145- 9 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1    obtaining the information. The disclosure of information 2    that bears on the public duties of public employees and 3    officials shall not be considered an invasion of personal 4    privacy. 5        (d) Records in the possession of any public body 6    created in the course of administrative enforcement 7    proceedings, and any law enforcement or correctional 8    agency for law enforcement purposes, but only to the 9    extent that disclosure would: 10            (i) interfere with pending or actually and 11        reasonably contemplated law enforcement proceedings 12        conducted by any law enforcement or correctional 13        agency that is the recipient of the request; 14            (ii) interfere with active administrative 15        enforcement proceedings conducted by the public body 16        that is the recipient of the request; 17            (iii) create a substantial likelihood that a 18        person will be deprived of a fair trial or an impartial 19        hearing; 20            (iv) unavoidably disclose the identity of a 21        confidential source, confidential information 22        furnished only by the confidential source, or persons 23        who file complaints with or provide information to 24        administrative, investigative, law enforcement, or 25        penal agencies; except that the identities of 26        witnesses to traffic crashes, traffic crash reports,   HB5145- 10 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1        and rescue reports shall be provided by agencies of 2        local government, except when disclosure would 3        interfere with an active criminal investigation 4        conducted by the agency that is the recipient of the 5        request; 6            (v) disclose unique or specialized investigative 7        techniques other than those generally used and known 8        or disclose internal documents of correctional 9        agencies related to detection, observation, or 10        investigation of incidents of crime or misconduct, and 11        disclosure would result in demonstrable harm to the 12        agency or public body that is the recipient of the 13        request; 14            (vi) endanger the life or physical safety of law 15        enforcement personnel or any other person; or 16            (vii) obstruct an ongoing criminal investigation 17        by the agency that is the recipient of the request. 18        (d-5) A law enforcement record created for law 19    enforcement purposes and contained in a shared electronic 20    record management system if the law enforcement agency or 21    criminal justice agency that is the recipient of the 22    request did not create the record, did not participate in 23    or have a role in any of the events which are the subject 24    of the record, and only has access to the record through 25    the shared electronic record management system. As used in 26    this subsection (d-5), "criminal justice agency" means the   HB5145- 11 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1    Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority or the 2    Illinois Sentencing Policy Advisory Council.3        (d-6) Records contained in the Officer Professional 4    Conduct Database under Section 9.2 of the Illinois Police 5    Training Act, except to the extent authorized under that 6    Section. This includes the documents supplied to the 7    Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board from the 8    Illinois State Police and Illinois State Police Merit 9    Board. 10        (d-7) Information gathered or records created from the 11    use of automatic license plate readers in connection with 12    Section 2-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. 13        (e) Records that relate to or affect the security of 14    correctional institutions and detention facilities. 15        (e-5) Records requested by persons committed to the 16    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 17    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 18    materials are available in the library of the correctional 19    institution or facility or jail where the inmate is 20    confined. 21        (e-6) Records requested by persons committed to the 22    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 23    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 24    materials include records from staff members' personnel 25    files, staff rosters, or other staffing assignment 26    information.   HB5145- 12 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1        (e-7) Records requested by persons committed to the 2    Department of Corrections or Department of Human Services 3    Division of Mental Health if those materials are available 4    through an administrative request to the Department of 5    Corrections or Department of Human Services Division of 6    Mental Health. 7        (e-8) Records requested by a person committed to the 8    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 9    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail, the 10    disclosure of which would result in the risk of harm to any 11    person or the risk of an escape from a jail or correctional 12    institution or facility.13        (e-9) Records requested by a person in a county jail 14    or committed to the Department of Corrections or 15    Department of Human Services Division of Mental Health, 16    containing personal information pertaining to the person's 17    victim or the victim's family, including, but not limited 18    to, a victim's home address, home telephone number, work 19    or school address, work telephone number, social security 20    number, or any other identifying information, except as 21    may be relevant to a requester's current or potential case 22    or claim. 23        (e-10) Law enforcement records of other persons 24    requested by a person committed to the Department of 25    Corrections, Department of Human Services Division of 26    Mental Health, or a county jail, including, but not   HB5145- 13 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1    limited to, arrest and booking records, mug shots, police 2    reports, body-worn camera footage, in-car camera footage, 3    and crime scene photographs, except as these records may 4    be relevant to the requester's current or potential case 5    or claim.6        (e-11) Law enforcement records of other persons 7    requested by a person or news media, including, but not 8    limited to, arrest and booking records if published 9    publicly, mug shots if published publicly, body-worn 10    camera footage, in-car camera footage, 9-1-1 audio files, 11    crime scene photographs, or other similar law enforcement 12    records, except as these records may be relevant to the 13    requester's current or potential case or claim. 14        (e-12) Law enforcement records requested by a person 15    in a manner that circumvents the process used by the 16    courts to address whether arrest and booking records, mug 17    shots, body-worn camera footage, in-car camera footage, 18    911 audio files, crime scene photographs, or other similar 19    law enforcement records are to be made publicly available, 20    except as these records may be relevant to the requester's 21    current or potential case or claim. 22        (f) Preliminary drafts, notes, recommendations, 23    memoranda, and other records in which opinions are 24    expressed, or policies or actions are formulated, except 25    that a specific record or relevant portion of a record 26    shall not be exempt when the record is publicly cited and   HB5145- 14 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1    identified by the head of the public body. The exemption 2    provided in this paragraph (f) extends to all those 3    records of officers and agencies of the General Assembly 4    that pertain to the preparation of legislative documents. 5        (g) Trade secrets and commercial or financial 6    information obtained from a person or business where the 7    trade secrets or commercial or financial information are 8    furnished under a claim that they are proprietary, 9    privileged, or confidential, and that disclosure of the 10    trade secrets or commercial or financial information would 11    cause competitive harm to the person or business, and only 12    insofar as the claim directly applies to the records 13    requested.14        The information included under this exemption includes 15    all trade secrets and commercial or financial information 16    obtained by a public body, including a public pension 17    fund, from a private equity fund or a privately held 18    company within the investment portfolio of a private 19    equity fund as a result of either investing or evaluating 20    a potential investment of public funds in a private equity 21    fund. The exemption contained in this item does not apply 22    to the aggregate financial performance information of a 23    private equity fund, nor to the identity of the fund's 24    managers or general partners. The exemption contained in 25    this item does not apply to the identity of a privately 26    held company within the investment portfolio of a private   HB5145- 15 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1    equity fund, unless the disclosure of the identity of a 2    privately held company may cause competitive harm.3        Nothing contained in this paragraph (g) shall be 4    construed to prevent a person or business from consenting 5    to disclosure. 6        (h) Proposals and bids for any contract, grant, or 7    agreement, including information which if it were 8    disclosed would frustrate procurement or give an advantage 9    to any person proposing to enter into a contractor 10    agreement with the body, until an award or final selection 11    is made. Information prepared by or for the body in 12    preparation of a bid solicitation shall be exempt until an 13    award or final selection is made. 14        (i) Valuable formulae, computer geographic systems, 15    designs, drawings, and research data obtained or produced 16    by any public body when disclosure could reasonably be 17    expected to produce private gain or public loss. The 18    exemption for "computer geographic systems" provided in 19    this paragraph (i) does not extend to requests made by 20    news media as defined in Section 2 of this Act when the 21    requested information is not otherwise exempt and the only 22    purpose of the request is to access and disseminate 23    information regarding the health, safety, welfare, or 24    legal rights of the general public. 25        (j) The following information pertaining to 26    educational matters:  HB5145- 16 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1            (i) test questions, scoring keys, and other 2        examination data used to administer an academic 3        examination; 4            (ii) information received by a primary or 5        secondary school, college, or university under its 6        procedures for the evaluation of faculty members by 7        their academic peers; 8            (iii) information concerning a school or 9        university's adjudication of student disciplinary 10        cases, but only to the extent that disclosure would 11        unavoidably reveal the identity of the student; and12            (iv) course materials or research materials used 13        by faculty members. 14        (k) Architects' plans, engineers' technical 15    submissions, and other construction related technical 16    documents for projects not constructed or developed in 17    whole or in part with public funds and the same for 18    projects constructed or developed with public funds, 19    including, but not limited to, power generating and 20    distribution stations and other transmission and 21    distribution facilities, water treatment facilities, 22    airport facilities, sport stadiums, convention centers, 23    and all government owned, operated, or occupied buildings, 24    but only to the extent that disclosure would compromise 25    security. 26        (l) Minutes of meetings of public bodies closed to the   HB5145- 17 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1    public as provided in the Open Meetings Act until the 2    public body makes the minutes available to the public 3    under Section 2.06 of the Open Meetings Act. 4        (m) Communications between a public body and an 5    attorney or auditor representing the public body that 6    would not be subject to discovery in litigation, and 7    materials prepared or compiled by or for a public body in 8    anticipation of a criminal, civil, or administrative 9    proceeding upon the request of an attorney advising the 10    public body, and materials prepared or compiled with 11    respect to internal audits of public bodies. 12        (n) Records relating to a public body's adjudication 13    of employee grievances or disciplinary cases; however, 14    this exemption shall not extend to the final outcome of 15    cases in which discipline is imposed. 16        (o) Administrative or technical information associated 17    with automated data processing operations, including, but 18    not limited to, software, operating protocols, computer 19    program abstracts, file layouts, source listings, object 20    modules, load modules, user guides, documentation 21    pertaining to all logical and physical design of 22    computerized systems, employee manuals, and any other 23    information that, if disclosed, would jeopardize the 24    security of the system or its data or the security of 25    materials exempt under this Section. 26        (p) Records relating to collective negotiating matters   HB5145- 18 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1    between public bodies and their employees or 2    representatives, except that any final contract or 3    agreement shall be subject to inspection and copying. 4        (q) Test questions, scoring keys, and other 5    examination data used to determine the qualifications of 6    an applicant for a license or employment. 7        (r) The records, documents, and information relating 8    to real estate purchase negotiations until those 9    negotiations have been completed or otherwise terminated. 10    With regard to a parcel involved in a pending or actually 11    and reasonably contemplated eminent domain proceeding 12    under the Eminent Domain Act, records, documents, and 13    information relating to that parcel shall be exempt except 14    as may be allowed under discovery rules adopted by the 15    Illinois Supreme Court. The records, documents, and 16    information relating to a real estate sale shall be exempt 17    until a sale is consummated. 18        (s) Any and all proprietary information and records 19    related to the operation of an intergovernmental risk 20    management association or self-insurance pool or jointly 21    self-administered health and accident cooperative or pool. 22    Insurance or self-insurance (including any 23    intergovernmental risk management association or 24    self-insurance pool) claims, loss or risk management 25    information, records, data, advice, or communications. 26        (t) Information contained in or related to   HB5145- 19 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1    examination, operating, or condition reports prepared by, 2    on behalf of, or for the use of a public body responsible 3    for the regulation or supervision of financial 4    institutions, insurance companies, or pharmacy benefit 5    managers, unless disclosure is otherwise required by State 6    law. 7        (u) Information that would disclose or might lead to 8    the disclosure of secret or confidential information, 9    codes, algorithms, programs, or private keys intended to 10    be used to create electronic signatures under the Uniform 11    Electronic Transactions Act. 12        (v) Vulnerability assessments, security measures, and 13    response policies or plans that are designed to identify, 14    prevent, or respond to potential attacks upon a 15    community's population or systems, facilities, or 16    installations, but only to the extent that disclosure 17    could reasonably be expected to expose the vulnerability 18    or jeopardize the effectiveness of the measures, policies, 19    or plans, or the safety of the personnel who implement 20    them or the public. Information exempt under this item may 21    include such things as details pertaining to the 22    mobilization or deployment of personnel or equipment, to 23    the operation of communication systems or protocols, to 24    cybersecurity vulnerabilities, or to tactical operations. 25        (w) (Blank). 26        (x) Maps and other records regarding the location or   HB5145- 20 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1    security of generation, transmission, distribution, 2    storage, gathering, treatment, or switching facilities 3    owned by a utility, by a power generator, or by the 4    Illinois Power Agency. 5        (y) Information contained in or related to proposals, 6    bids, or negotiations related to electric power 7    procurement under Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power 8    Agency Act and Section 16-111.5 of the Public Utilities 9    Act that is determined to be confidential and proprietary 10    by the Illinois Power Agency or by the Illinois Commerce 11    Commission. 12        (z) Information about students exempted from 13    disclosure under Section 10-20.38 or 34-18.29 of the 14    School Code, and information about undergraduate students 15    enrolled at an institution of higher education exempted 16    from disclosure under Section 25 of the Illinois Credit 17    Card Marketing Act of 2009. 18        (aa) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 19    under the Viatical Settlements Act of 2009. 20        (bb) Records and information provided to a mortality 21    review team and records maintained by a mortality review 22    team appointed under the Department of Juvenile Justice 23    Mortality Review Team Act. 24        (cc) Information regarding interments, entombments, or 25    inurnments of human remains that are submitted to the 26    Cemetery Oversight Database under the Cemetery Care Act or   HB5145- 21 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1    the Cemetery Oversight Act, whichever is applicable.2        (dd) Correspondence and records (i) that may not be 3    disclosed under Section 11-9 of the Illinois Public Aid 4    Code or (ii) that pertain to appeals under Section 11-8 of 5    the Illinois Public Aid Code. 6        (ee) The names, addresses, or other personal 7    information of persons who are minors and are also 8    participants and registrants in programs of park 9    districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 10    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 11    associations.12        (ff) The names, addresses, or other personal 13    information of participants and registrants in programs of 14    park districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 15    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 16    associations where such programs are targeted primarily to 17    minors.18        (gg) Confidential information described in Section 19    1-100 of the Illinois Independent Tax Tribunal Act of 20    2012. 21        (hh) The report submitted to the State Board of 22    Education by the School Security and Standards Task Force 23    under item (8) of subsection (d) of Section 2-3.160 of the 24    School Code and any information contained in that report. 25        (ii) Records requested by persons committed to or 26    detained by the Department of Human Services under the   HB5145- 22 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1    Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act or committed to 2    the Department of Corrections under the Sexually Dangerous 3    Persons Act if those materials: (i) are available in the 4    library of the facility where the individual is confined; 5    (ii) include records from staff members' personnel files, 6    staff rosters, or other staffing assignment information; 7    or (iii) are available through an administrative request 8    to the Department of Human Services or the Department of 9    Corrections.10        (jj) Confidential information described in Section 11    5-535 of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 12        (kk) The public body's credit card numbers, debit card 13    numbers, bank account numbers, Federal Employer 14    Identification Number, security code numbers, passwords, 15    and similar account information, the disclosure of which 16    could result in identity theft or impression or defrauding 17    of a governmental entity or a person. 18        (ll) Records concerning the work of the threat 19    assessment team of a school district, including, but not 20    limited to, any threat assessment procedure under the 21    School Safety Drill Act and any information contained in 22    the procedure.23        (mm) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 24    subsections (a) and (b) of Section 15 of the Student 25    Confidential Reporting Act. 26        (nn) Proprietary information submitted to the   HB5145- 23 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1    Environmental Protection Agency under the Drug Take-Back 2    Act. 3        (oo) Records described in subsection (f) of Section 4    3-5-1 of the Unified Code of Corrections. 5        (pp) Any and all information regarding burials, 6    interments, or entombments of human remains as required to 7    be reported to the Department of Natural Resources 8    pursuant either to the Archaeological and Paleontological 9    Resources Protection Act or the Human Remains Protection 10    Act.11        (qq) Reports described in subsection (e) of Section 12    16-15 of the Abortion Care Clinical Training Program Act. 13        (rr) Information obtained by a certified local health 14    department under the Access to Public Health Data Act. 15        (ss) For a request directed to a public body that is 16    also a HIPAA-covered entity, all information that is 17    protected health information, including demographic 18    information, that may be contained within or extracted 19    from any record held by the public body in compliance with 20    State and federal medical privacy laws and regulations, 21    including, but not limited to, the Health Insurance 22    Portability and Accountability Act and its regulations, 45 23    CFR Parts 160 and 164. As used in this paragraph, 24    "HIPAA-covered entity" has the meaning given to the term 25    "covered entity" in 45 CFR 160.103 and "protected health 26    information" has the meaning given to that term in 45 CFR   HB5145- 24 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1    160.103. 2        (tt) Proposals or bids submitted by engineering 3    consultants in response to requests for proposal or other 4    competitive bidding requests by the Department of 5    Transportation or the Illinois Toll Highway Authority. 6        (uu) Documents that, pursuant to the State of 7    Illinois' 1987 Agreement with the U.S. Nuclear Regulatory 8    Commission and the corresponding requirement to maintain 9    compatibility with the National Materials Program, have 10    been determined to be security sensitive. These documents 11    include information classified as safeguards, 12    safeguards-modified, and sensitive unclassified 13    nonsafeguards information, as identified in U.S. Nuclear 14    Regulatory Commission regulatory information summaries, 15    security advisories, and other applicable communications 16    or regulations related to the control and distribution of 17    security sensitive information. 18    (1.5) Any information exempt from disclosure under the 19Judicial Privacy Act shall be redacted from public records 20prior to disclosure under this Act. 21    (1.6) Any information exempt from disclosure under the 22Public Official Safety and Privacy Act shall be redacted from 23public records prior to disclosure under this Act.24    (1.7) Any information exempt from disclosure under 25paragraph (3.5) of Section 9-15 of the Election Code shall be 26redacted from public records prior to disclosure under this   HB5145- 25 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1Act.2    (2) A public record that is not in the possession of a 3public body but is in the possession of a party with whom the 4agency has contracted to perform a governmental function on 5behalf of the public body, and that directly relates to the 6governmental function and is not otherwise exempt under this 7Act, shall be considered a public record of the public body, 8for purposes of this Act. 9    (3) This Section does not authorize withholding of 10information or limit the availability of records to the 11public, except as stated in this Section or otherwise provided 12in this Act. 13(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-423, eff. 1-1-24; 14103-446, eff. 8-4-23; 103-462, eff. 8-4-23; 103-540, eff. 151-1-24; 103-554, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-865, 16eff. 1-1-25; 104-438, eff. 1-1-26; 104-443, eff. 1-1-26; 17revised 1-7-26.) 18    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-300)19    Sec. 7. Exemptions. 20    (1) When a request is made to inspect or copy a public 21record that contains information that is exempt from 22disclosure under this Section, but also contains information 23that is not exempt from disclosure, the public body may elect 24to redact the information that is exempt. The public body 25shall make the remaining information available for inspection   HB5145- 26 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1and copying. Subject to this requirement, the following shall 2be exempt from inspection and copying: 3        (a) Records created or compiled by a State public 4    defender agency or commission subject to the State Public 5    Defender Act that contain: individual client identity; 6    individual case file information; individual investigation 7    records and other records that are otherwise subject to 8    attorney-client privilege; records that would not be 9    discoverable in litigation; records under Section 2.15; 10    training materials; records related to attorney 11    consultation and representation strategy; or any of the 12    above concerning clients of county public defenders or 13    other defender agencies and firms. This exclusion does not 14    apply to deidentified, aggregated, administrative records, 15    such as general case processing and workload information. 16        (a-5) Information specifically prohibited from 17    disclosure by federal or State law or rules and 18    regulations implementing federal or State law. 19        (b) Private information, unless disclosure is required 20    by another provision of this Act, a State or federal law, 21    or a court order. 22        (b-5) Files, documents, and other data or databases 23    maintained by one or more law enforcement agencies and 24    specifically designed to provide information to one or 25    more law enforcement agencies regarding the physical or 26    mental status of one or more individual subjects.   HB5145- 27 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1        (c) Personal information contained within public 2    records, the disclosure of which would constitute a 3    clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy, unless 4    the disclosure is consented to in writing by the 5    individual subjects of the information. "Unwarranted 6    invasion of personal privacy" means the disclosure of 7    information that is highly personal or objectionable to a 8    reasonable person and in which the subject's right to 9    privacy outweighs any legitimate public interest in 10    obtaining the information. The disclosure of information 11    that bears on the public duties of public employees and 12    officials shall not be considered an invasion of personal 13    privacy. 14        (d) Records in the possession of any public body 15    created in the course of administrative enforcement 16    proceedings, and any law enforcement or correctional 17    agency for law enforcement purposes, but only to the 18    extent that disclosure would: 19            (i) interfere with pending or actually and 20        reasonably contemplated law enforcement proceedings 21        conducted by any law enforcement or correctional 22        agency that is the recipient of the request; 23            (ii) interfere with active administrative 24        enforcement proceedings conducted by the public body 25        that is the recipient of the request; 26            (iii) create a substantial likelihood that a   HB5145- 28 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1        person will be deprived of a fair trial or an impartial 2        hearing; 3            (iv) unavoidably disclose the identity of a 4        confidential source, confidential information 5        furnished only by the confidential source, or persons 6        who file complaints with or provide information to 7        administrative, investigative, law enforcement, or 8        penal agencies; except that the identities of 9        witnesses to traffic crashes, traffic crash reports, 10        and rescue reports shall be provided by agencies of 11        local government, except when disclosure would 12        interfere with an active criminal investigation 13        conducted by the agency that is the recipient of the 14        request; 15            (v) disclose unique or specialized investigative 16        techniques other than those generally used and known 17        or disclose internal documents of correctional 18        agencies related to detection, observation, or 19        investigation of incidents of crime or misconduct, and 20        disclosure would result in demonstrable harm to the 21        agency or public body that is the recipient of the 22        request; 23            (vi) endanger the life or physical safety of law 24        enforcement personnel or any other person; or 25            (vii) obstruct an ongoing criminal investigation 26        by the agency that is the recipient of the request.   HB5145- 29 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1        (d-5) A law enforcement record created for law 2    enforcement purposes and contained in a shared electronic 3    record management system if the law enforcement agency or 4    criminal justice agency that is the recipient of the 5    request did not create the record, did not participate in 6    or have a role in any of the events which are the subject 7    of the record, and only has access to the record through 8    the shared electronic record management system. As used in 9    this subsection (d-5), "criminal justice agency" means the 10    Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority or the 11    Illinois Sentencing Policy Advisory Council.12        (d-6) Records contained in the Officer Professional 13    Conduct Database under Section 9.2 of the Illinois Police 14    Training Act, except to the extent authorized under that 15    Section. This includes the documents supplied to the 16    Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board from the 17    Illinois State Police and Illinois State Police Merit 18    Board. 19        (d-7) Information gathered or records created from the 20    use of automatic license plate readers in connection with 21    Section 2-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. 22        (e) Records that relate to or affect the security of 23    correctional institutions and detention facilities. 24        (e-5) Records requested by persons committed to the 25    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 26    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those   HB5145- 30 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1    materials are available in the library of the correctional 2    institution or facility or jail where the inmate is 3    confined. 4        (e-6) Records requested by persons committed to the 5    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 6    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 7    materials include records from staff members' personnel 8    files, staff rosters, or other staffing assignment 9    information. 10        (e-7) Records requested by persons committed to the 11    Department of Corrections or Department of Human Services 12    Division of Mental Health if those materials are available 13    through an administrative request to the Department of 14    Corrections or Department of Human Services Division of 15    Mental Health. 16        (e-8) Records requested by a person committed to the 17    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 18    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail, the 19    disclosure of which would result in the risk of harm to any 20    person or the risk of an escape from a jail or correctional 21    institution or facility.22        (e-9) Records requested by a person in a county jail 23    or committed to the Department of Corrections or 24    Department of Human Services Division of Mental Health, 25    containing personal information pertaining to the person's 26    victim or the victim's family, including, but not limited   HB5145- 31 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1    to, a victim's home address, home telephone number, work 2    or school address, work telephone number, social security 3    number, or any other identifying information, except as 4    may be relevant to a requester's current or potential case 5    or claim. 6        (e-10) Law enforcement records of other persons 7    requested by a person committed to the Department of 8    Corrections, Department of Human Services Division of 9    Mental Health, or a county jail, including, but not 10    limited to, arrest and booking records, mug shots, police 11    reports, body-worn camera footage, in-car camera footage, 12    and crime scene photographs, except as these records may 13    be relevant to the requester's current or potential case 14    or claim.15        (e-11) Law enforcement records of other persons 16    requested by a person or news media, including, but not 17    limited to, arrest and booking records if published 18    publicly, mug shots if published publicly, body-worn 19    camera footage, in-car camera footage, 911 audio files, 20    crime scene photographs, or other similar law enforcement 21    records, except as these records may be relevant to the 22    requester's current or potential case or claim. 23        (e-12) Law enforcement records requested by a person 24    in a manner that circumvents the process used by the 25    courts to address whether arrest and booking records, mug 26    shots, body-worn camera footage, in-car camera footage,   HB5145- 32 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1    911 audio files, crime scene photographs, or other similar 2    law enforcement records are to be made publicly available, 3    except as these records may be relevant to the requester's 4    current or potential case or claim. 5        (f) Preliminary drafts, notes, recommendations, 6    memoranda, and other records in which opinions are 7    expressed, or policies or actions are formulated, except 8    that a specific record or relevant portion of a record 9    shall not be exempt when the record is publicly cited and 10    identified by the head of the public body. The exemption 11    provided in this paragraph (f) extends to all those 12    records of officers and agencies of the General Assembly 13    that pertain to the preparation of legislative documents. 14        (g) Trade secrets and commercial or financial 15    information obtained from a person or business where the 16    trade secrets or commercial or financial information are 17    furnished under a claim that they are proprietary, 18    privileged, or confidential, and that disclosure of the 19    trade secrets or commercial or financial information would 20    cause competitive harm to the person or business, and only 21    insofar as the claim directly applies to the records 22    requested.23        The information included under this exemption includes 24    all trade secrets and commercial or financial information 25    obtained by a public body, including a public pension 26    fund, from a private equity fund or a privately held   HB5145- 33 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1    company within the investment portfolio of a private 2    equity fund as a result of either investing or evaluating 3    a potential investment of public funds in a private equity 4    fund. The exemption contained in this item does not apply 5    to the aggregate financial performance information of a 6    private equity fund, nor to the identity of the fund's 7    managers or general partners. The exemption contained in 8    this item does not apply to the identity of a privately 9    held company within the investment portfolio of a private 10    equity fund, unless the disclosure of the identity of a 11    privately held company may cause competitive harm.12        Nothing contained in this paragraph (g) shall be 13    construed to prevent a person or business from consenting 14    to disclosure. 15        (h) Proposals and bids for any contract, grant, or 16    agreement, including information which if it were 17    disclosed would frustrate procurement or give an advantage 18    to any person proposing to enter into a contractor 19    agreement with the body, until an award or final selection 20    is made. Information prepared by or for the body in 21    preparation of a bid solicitation shall be exempt until an 22    award or final selection is made. 23        (i) Valuable formulae, computer geographic systems, 24    designs, drawings, and research data obtained or produced 25    by any public body when disclosure could reasonably be 26    expected to produce private gain or public loss. The   HB5145- 34 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1    exemption for "computer geographic systems" provided in 2    this paragraph (i) does not extend to requests made by 3    news media as defined in Section 2 of this Act when the 4    requested information is not otherwise exempt and the only 5    purpose of the request is to access and disseminate 6    information regarding the health, safety, welfare, or 7    legal rights of the general public. 8        (j) The following information pertaining to 9    educational matters:10            (i) test questions, scoring keys, and other 11        examination data used to administer an academic 12        examination; 13            (ii) information received by a primary or 14        secondary school, college, or university under its 15        procedures for the evaluation of faculty members by 16        their academic peers; 17            (iii) information concerning a school or 18        university's adjudication of student disciplinary 19        cases, but only to the extent that disclosure would 20        unavoidably reveal the identity of the student; and21            (iv) course materials or research materials used 22        by faculty members. 23        (k) Architects' plans, engineers' technical 24    submissions, and other construction related technical 25    documents for projects not constructed or developed in 26    whole or in part with public funds and the same for   HB5145- 35 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1    projects constructed or developed with public funds, 2    including, but not limited to, power generating and 3    distribution stations and other transmission and 4    distribution facilities, water treatment facilities, 5    airport facilities, sport stadiums, convention centers, 6    and all government owned, operated, or occupied buildings, 7    but only to the extent that disclosure would compromise 8    security. 9        (l) Minutes of meetings of public bodies closed to the 10    public as provided in the Open Meetings Act until the 11    public body makes the minutes available to the public 12    under Section 2.06 of the Open Meetings Act. 13        (m) Communications between a public body and an 14    attorney or auditor representing the public body that 15    would not be subject to discovery in litigation, and 16    materials prepared or compiled by or for a public body in 17    anticipation of a criminal, civil, or administrative 18    proceeding upon the request of an attorney advising the 19    public body, and materials prepared or compiled with 20    respect to internal audits of public bodies. 21        (n) Records relating to a public body's adjudication 22    of employee grievances or disciplinary cases; however, 23    this exemption shall not extend to the final outcome of 24    cases in which discipline is imposed. 25        (o) Administrative or technical information associated 26    with automated data processing operations, including, but   HB5145- 36 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1    not limited to, software, operating protocols, computer 2    program abstracts, file layouts, source listings, object 3    modules, load modules, user guides, documentation 4    pertaining to all logical and physical design of 5    computerized systems, employee manuals, and any other 6    information that, if disclosed, would jeopardize the 7    security of the system or its data or the security of 8    materials exempt under this Section. 9        (p) Records relating to collective negotiating matters 10    between public bodies and their employees or 11    representatives, except that any final contract or 12    agreement shall be subject to inspection and copying. 13        (q) Test questions, scoring keys, and other 14    examination data used to determine the qualifications of 15    an applicant for a license or employment. 16        (r) The records, documents, and information relating 17    to real estate purchase negotiations until those 18    negotiations have been completed or otherwise terminated. 19    With regard to a parcel involved in a pending or actually 20    and reasonably contemplated eminent domain proceeding 21    under the Eminent Domain Act, records, documents, and 22    information relating to that parcel shall be exempt except 23    as may be allowed under discovery rules adopted by the 24    Illinois Supreme Court. The records, documents, and 25    information relating to a real estate sale shall be exempt 26    until a sale is consummated.   HB5145- 37 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1        (s) Any and all proprietary information and records 2    related to the operation of an intergovernmental risk 3    management association or self-insurance pool or jointly 4    self-administered health and accident cooperative or pool. 5    Insurance or self-insurance (including any 6    intergovernmental risk management association or 7    self-insurance pool) claims, loss or risk management 8    information, records, data, advice, or communications. 9        (t) Information contained in or related to 10    examination, operating, or condition reports prepared by, 11    on behalf of, or for the use of a public body responsible 12    for the regulation or supervision of financial 13    institutions, insurance companies, or pharmacy benefit 14    managers, unless disclosure is otherwise required by State 15    law. 16        (u) Information that would disclose or might lead to 17    the disclosure of secret or confidential information, 18    codes, algorithms, programs, or private keys intended to 19    be used to create electronic signatures under the Uniform 20    Electronic Transactions Act. 21        (v) Vulnerability assessments, security measures, and 22    response policies or plans that are designed to identify, 23    prevent, or respond to potential attacks upon a 24    community's population or systems, facilities, or 25    installations, but only to the extent that disclosure 26    could reasonably be expected to expose the vulnerability   HB5145- 38 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1    or jeopardize the effectiveness of the measures, policies, 2    or plans, or the safety of the personnel who implement 3    them or the public. Information exempt under this item may 4    include such things as details pertaining to the 5    mobilization or deployment of personnel or equipment, to 6    the operation of communication systems or protocols, to 7    cybersecurity vulnerabilities, or to tactical operations. 8        (w) (Blank). 9        (x) Maps and other records regarding the location or 10    security of generation, transmission, distribution, 11    storage, gathering, treatment, or switching facilities 12    owned by a utility, by a power generator, or by the 13    Illinois Power Agency. 14        (y) Information contained in or related to proposals, 15    bids, or negotiations related to electric power 16    procurement under Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power 17    Agency Act and Section 16-111.5 of the Public Utilities 18    Act that is determined to be confidential and proprietary 19    by the Illinois Power Agency or by the Illinois Commerce 20    Commission. 21        (z) Information about students exempted from 22    disclosure under Section 10-20.38 or 34-18.29 of the 23    School Code, and information about undergraduate students 24    enrolled at an institution of higher education exempted 25    from disclosure under Section 25 of the Illinois Credit 26    Card Marketing Act of 2009.   HB5145- 39 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1        (aa) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 2    under the Viatical Settlements Act of 2009. 3        (bb) Records and information provided to a mortality 4    review team and records maintained by a mortality review 5    team appointed under the Department of Juvenile Justice 6    Mortality Review Team Act. 7        (cc) Information regarding interments, entombments, or 8    inurnments of human remains that are submitted to the 9    Cemetery Oversight Database under the Cemetery Care Act or 10    the Cemetery Oversight Act, whichever is applicable.11        (dd) Correspondence and records (i) that may not be 12    disclosed under Section 11-9 of the Illinois Public Aid 13    Code or (ii) that pertain to appeals under Section 11-8 of 14    the Illinois Public Aid Code. 15        (ee) The names, addresses, or other personal 16    information of persons who are minors and are also 17    participants and registrants in programs of park 18    districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 19    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 20    associations.21        (ff) The names, addresses, or other personal 22    information of participants and registrants in programs of 23    park districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 24    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 25    associations where such programs are targeted primarily to 26    minors.  HB5145- 40 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1        (gg) Confidential information described in Section 2    1-100 of the Illinois Independent Tax Tribunal Act of 3    2012. 4        (hh) The report submitted to the State Board of 5    Education by the School Security and Standards Task Force 6    under item (8) of subsection (d) of Section 2-3.160 of the 7    School Code and any information contained in that report. 8        (ii) Records requested by persons committed to or 9    detained by the Department of Human Services under the 10    Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act or committed to 11    the Department of Corrections under the Sexually Dangerous 12    Persons Act if those materials: (i) are available in the 13    library of the facility where the individual is confined; 14    (ii) include records from staff members' personnel files, 15    staff rosters, or other staffing assignment information; 16    or (iii) are available through an administrative request 17    to the Department of Human Services or the Department of 18    Corrections.19        (jj) Confidential information described in Section 20    5-535 of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 21        (kk) The public body's credit card numbers, debit card 22    numbers, bank account numbers, Federal Employer 23    Identification Number, security code numbers, passwords, 24    and similar account information, the disclosure of which 25    could result in identity theft or impression or defrauding 26    of a governmental entity or a person.   HB5145- 41 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1        (ll) Records concerning the work of the threat 2    assessment team of a school district, including, but not 3    limited to, any threat assessment procedure under the 4    School Safety Drill Act and any information contained in 5    the procedure.6        (mm) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 7    subsections (a) and (b) of Section 15 of the Student 8    Confidential Reporting Act. 9        (nn) Proprietary information submitted to the 10    Environmental Protection Agency under the Drug Take-Back 11    Act. 12        (oo) Records described in subsection (f) of Section 13    3-5-1 of the Unified Code of Corrections. 14        (pp) Any and all information regarding burials, 15    interments, or entombments of human remains as required to 16    be reported to the Department of Natural Resources 17    pursuant either to the Archaeological and Paleontological 18    Resources Protection Act or the Human Remains Protection 19    Act.20        (qq) Reports described in subsection (e) of Section 21    16-15 of the Abortion Care Clinical Training Program Act. 22        (rr) Information obtained by a certified local health 23    department under the Access to Public Health Data Act. 24        (ss) For a request directed to a public body that is 25    also a HIPAA-covered entity, all information that is 26    protected health information, including demographic   HB5145- 42 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1    information, that may be contained within or extracted 2    from any record held by the public body in compliance with 3    State and federal medical privacy laws and regulations, 4    including, but not limited to, the Health Insurance 5    Portability and Accountability Act and its regulations, 45 6    CFR Parts 160 and 164. As used in this paragraph, 7    "HIPAA-covered entity" has the meaning given to the term 8    "covered entity" in 45 CFR 160.103 and "protected health 9    information" has the meaning given to that term in 45 CFR 10    160.103. 11        (tt) Proposals or bids submitted by engineering 12    consultants in response to requests for proposal or other 13    competitive bidding requests by the Department of 14    Transportation or the Illinois Toll Highway Authority. 15        (uu) Documents that, pursuant to the State of 16    Illinois' 1987 Agreement with the U.S. Nuclear Regulatory 17    Commission and the corresponding requirement to maintain 18    compatibility with the National Materials Program, have 19    been determined to be security sensitive. These documents 20    include information classified as safeguards, 21    safeguards-modified, and sensitive unclassified 22    nonsafeguards information, as identified in U.S. Nuclear 23    Regulatory Commission regulatory information summaries, 24    security advisories, and other applicable communications 25    or regulations related to the control and distribution of 26    security sensitive information.   HB5145- 43 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1    (1.5) Any information exempt from disclosure under the 2Judicial Privacy Act shall be redacted from public records 3prior to disclosure under this Act. 4    (1.6) Any information exempt from disclosure under the 5Public Official Safety and Privacy Act shall be redacted from 6public records prior to disclosure under this Act.7    (1.7) Any information exempt from disclosure under 8paragraph (3.5) of Section 9-15 of the Election Code shall be 9redacted from public records prior to disclosure under this 10Act.11    (2) A public record that is not in the possession of a 12public body but is in the possession of a party with whom the 13agency has contracted to perform a governmental function on 14behalf of the public body, and that directly relates to the 15governmental function and is not otherwise exempt under this 16Act, shall be considered a public record of the public body, 17for purposes of this Act. 18    (3) This Section does not authorize withholding of 19information or limit the availability of records to the 20public, except as stated in this Section or otherwise provided 21in this Act. 22(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-423, eff. 1-1-24; 23103-446, eff. 8-4-23; 103-462, eff. 8-4-23; 103-540, eff. 241-1-24; 103-554, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-865, 25eff. 1-1-25; 104-300, eff. 1-1-27; 104-438, eff. 1-1-26; 26104-443, eff. 1-1-26; revised 1-7-26.)   HB5145- 44 -LRB104 20125 BDA 33576 b1    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 2changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 3that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 4represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 5not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 6made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 7Public Act.